test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kwql_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kõʼl: # Noun 73 'eng /est kõle/fin' - full paradigm
     kõʼl+N+Sg+Nom: [kõʼl, kõʼl]
     kõʼl+N+Sg+Gen: [kõʼl, kõʼl]
     kõʼl+N+Sg+Par: [kõʼllõ, kõʼllõ]
     kõʼl+N+Sg+Dat: [kõʼllõn, kõʼllõn]
     kõʼl+N+Sg+Ins: [kõʼlkõks, kõʼlkõks]
     kõʼl+N+Sg+Ill: [kõʼllõ, kõʼllõ]
     kõʼl+N+Sg+Ela: [kõʼlstõ, kõʼlstõ]
     kõʼl+N+Pl+Nom: kõlūd
     kõʼl+N+Pl+Gen: kõlūd
     kõʼl+N+Pl+Par: [kõʼļḑi, kõļḑi]
     kõʼl+N+Pl+Dat: kõlūdõn
     kõʼl+N+Pl+Ins: kõlūdõks
     kõʼl+N+Pl+Ill: [kõʼļži, kõļži]
     kõʼl+N+Pl+Ela: [kõʼļšti, kõļšti]
